Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 33 Packaged Bakery Products

21-33-1.
Definitions.

“Packaged bakery product” when used in this chapter means a packaged bakery or bakery-type product, consisting of flour and other ingredients having a normal shelf life as established by the manufacturer or distributor of sixty (60) days or less. The term shall not include frozen or canned products or foods that are or may be baked as part of a cooking or preparation procedure.

“Pull date” as used in this chapter is the final date or day as established by the packer or manufacturer upon which a packaged bakery product may be sold, except as provided in §

21-33-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 147, § 2.

21-33-2.
Pull date to be displayed.

No packaged bakery product shall be sold in this state unless the pull date of the product shall appear in a conspicuous place upon the package in which it is sold.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 147, § 2.

21-33-3.
Sales after pull date permitted.

Any provision to the contrary notwithstanding, packaged bakery products may be sold after their pull date, provided, that:

The products are segregated from products which have not passed their pull date; and

Shelf markers or placards, or markings on the individual packages clearly identify the products as being offered for sale “past date.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 147, § 2.

21-33-4.
Notice of minor violations.

The director of health shall not be required under this chapter to institute any prosecution for minor violations whenever he or she shall determine that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 147, § 2.

21-33-5.
Construction with other laws.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any act otherwise prohibited under any other provision of the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 147, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 66.

21-33-5.1.
Exemptions.

The following are exempt from the provisions of this chapter:

All persons, firms, or corporations whose principal business activity is the sale at retail of bakery products and who or which prepare and offer for sale packaged bakery products in the same premises.

All persons, firms, or corporations whose principal business activity is the sale at retail of bakery products and who or which prepare packaged bakery products in premises within the state of Rhode Island, and who or which transport or deliver these products for sale to retail sales stores or premises within the state of Rhode Island, which retail sales stores or premises are under the supervision and controls of the person, firm, or corporation who or which prepare the products.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 241, § 1.

21-33-6.
Enforcement — Penalty for violations.

The director of health shall enforce this chapter. Any person, firm, or corporation who or which violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 147, § 2.